Idaho, session 2026, H0730.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 2, Title 56, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 56-205A, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
56-205A. SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM INTEGRITY
MEASURES. (1) The department of health and welfare shall enter into a
data-matching agreement with the Idaho state lottery commission to identify
households with lottery winnings of three thousand dollars ($3,000) or more
and, to the extent permissible under federal law, shall treat this data as
verified upon receipt. To the extent that the data may not be verified upon
receipt, the department shall make referrals for further investigation to
identify households with winnings equal to or greater than the resource
limit for elderly or disabled households as defined in 7 U.S.C. 2014(g)(1).
The department shall promptly disenroll from the supplemental nutrition as-
sistance program (SNAP) any household with winnings equal to or greater than
the resource limit for elderly or disabled households.
(2) On at least a monthly basis, the department of health and welfare
shall:
(a) Review information from the bureau of vital records and health sta-
tistics concerning individuals in households enrolled in SNAP that in-
dicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for SNAP,
including but not limited to death records;
(b) Receive and review information concerning individuals in house-
holds enrolled in SNAP that indicates a change in circumstances that
may affect eligibility for SNAP, including but not limited to potential
changes in residency as identified by out-of-state electronic benefit
transfer transactions;
(c) Receive and review information from the state department of cor-
rection concerning individuals in households enrolled in SNAP that in-
dicates a change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for SNAP,
including but not limited to incarceration status; and
(d) To assess continued eligibility and act on findings, review and act
on the following data from federal sources:


(i) Earned income information, death register information, in-
carceration records, supplemental security income information,
beneficiary records, earnings information, and pension informa-
tion maintained by the United States social security administra-
tion;
(ii) Income and employment information maintained in the national
directory of new hires database and child support enforcement data
maintained by the United States department of health and human
services;
(iii) Payment and earnings information maintained by the United
States department of housing and urban development;
(iv) National fleeing felon information maintained by the federal
bureau of investigation; and
(v) Address change information maintained in the United States
postal service national change of address database.
(3) On at least a quarterly basis, the department of health and welfare
shall:
(a) Receive and review information from the department of labor con-
cerning individuals in households enrolled in SNAP that indicates a
change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for SNAP, including
but not limited to changes in employment or wages; and
(b) Receive and review information from the state tax commission con-
cerning individuals in households enrolled in SNAP that indicates a
change in circumstances that may affect eligibility for SNAP, including
but not limited to potential changes in income, wages, or residency as
identified by tax records.
(4) On at least a biannual basis, the department of health and welfare
shall make available to the public on its website data from findings of non-
compliance and fraud investigations in SNAP for the following aggregate,
nonconfidential, and non-personally identifying information:
(a) The number of households investigated for intentional program vio-
lations or fraud;
(b) The total number of households referred for prosecution to the at-
torney general's office and United States attorney's office;
(c) Improper payments and expenditures;
(d) Moneys recovered;
(e) Aggregate data concerning improper payments and ineligible recipi-
ents as a percentage of those investigated and reviewed; and
(f) The aggregate amount of funds expended by electronic benefit trans-
fer card transactions in each state outside of Idaho.
(5) If the department of health and welfare receives information con-
cerning an individual receiving SNAP benefits that indicates a change in
circumstances that may affect eligibility for SNAP, the department shall
review the household's case.
(6) In no case shall categorical eligibility under 7 U.S.C. 2014(a) or
7 CFR 273.2(j)(2)(ii) be granted for any noncash, in-kind, or other benefit,
unless expressly required by federal law for SNAP.
(7) The department of health and welfare shall not apply gross income
standards for SNAP higher than the standards specified in 7 U.S.C. 2014(c)
or allowable financial resources higher than the standards specified in 7


U.S.C. 2014(g)(1), other than financial resources described in 7 U.S.C.
2014(g)(2)(D), unless expressly required by federal law. Exempting house-
holds from such gross income standards or allowable financial resource
standards shall not be granted, unless expressly required by federal law.
(8) The department of health and welfare may apply alternate vehicle
allowance standards authorized by 7 U.S.C. 2014(g)(2)(D).
(9) The department of health and welfare shall assign certification pe-
riods no greater than six (6) months to households with zero (0) net income,
households that include an able-bodied adult without dependents, and other
households whose circumstances are determined by the department to be unsta-
ble, unless otherwise prohibited by federal law.
(10) The department of health and welfare shall assign certification
periods of one (1) to two (2) months to households that the department deter-
mined will become ineligible for SNAP in the near future, unless otherwise
prohibited under federal law.
SECTION 2. That Section 56-211, Idaho Code, be, and the same is hereby
amended to read as follows:
56-211. APPLICATION FOR PUBLIC ASSISTANCE -- VERIFICATION FOR FEDERAL
FOOD STAMP SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM. (1) Application for
public assistance under this act section shall be made in the manner and form
prescribed by the state department and the application shall contain such
information bearing on the applicant's eligibility as the state department
may require and as required in subsection (2) of this section.
(2) Applicants seeking benefits under the federal food stamp
supplemental nutrition assistance program (SNAP) shall verify to the state
department the identity of each household member the applicant lists on
the application for such benefits. Identification may be verified either
through readily available documentary evidence, such as a birth certifi-
cate, or through a collateral contact as set forth in federal law, 7 CFR
273.2. Upon a showing of good cause by the applicant as to why such doc-
umentary evidence or collateral contact has not been provided, the state
department shall grant an extension and the applicant may receive the pub-
lic assistance for which he or she has applied for one (1) month. A showing
of good cause shall be required each month the applicant fails to provide
the state department with the required documentary evidence or collateral
contact. Good cause is not shown where a delay in providing documentary
evidence or providing a collateral contact is due to illness, lack of trans-
portation or temporary absences. The provisions of this subsection shall
not apply to applicants who provide, or who have previously provided, a docu-
ment as set forth in section 67-7903(4)(b)(viii) or (ix), Idaho Code.
(3) Pursuant to 7 U.S.C. 2015(f), no individual shall be eligible to re-
ceive SNAP benefits unless the individual is a resident of the United States
and is:
(a) A citizen or national of the United States;
(b) An alien lawfully admitted for permanent residence as an immigrant,
as defined in 8 U.S.C. 1101(a)(15) or 1101(a)(20), excluding alien
visitors, tourists, diplomats, students, or other individuals admit-
ted temporarily without intent to abandon their residence in a foreign
country;


(c) An alien who has been granted the status of Cuban or Haitian en-
trant, as defined in section 501(e), P.L. 96-422; or
(d) An individual lawfully residing in the United States in accordance
with a compact of free association pursuant to 8 U.S.C. 1612(b)(2)(G).
(4) The department shall verify the eligibility for SNAP of applicants
and enrollees pursuant to subsection (3) of this section as follows:
(a) If an individual is not a citizen or national of the United States
but is eligible to receive SNAP benefits pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section, the department shall be required to verify eligible alien
status using the systematic alien verification for entitlements (SAVE)
program during enrollment and each eligibility recertification. If
SAVE verification is unsuccessful, the individual shall submit accept-
able documentation to verify eligible alien status, including but not
limited to a permanent resident card, an employment authorization doc-
ument, or other official documentation issued by a federal government
agency, as determined by the department.
(b) If an individual is a citizen or national of the United States for
the purposes of eligibility pursuant to subsection (3) of this section,
the department shall verify such citizenship or nationality during en-
rollment using secure and verifiable documentation, including but not
limited to a certified birth certificate, a United States passport, a
certificate of naturalization, a certificate of citizenship, or a con-
sular report of birth abroad. Verification at recertification shall be
required only if the department has reason to question the individual's
previously verified citizenship or nationality.
(5) If verification confirms that an applicant or enrollee for SNAP is
not lawfully present in the United States or no longer qualifies pursuant to
this section or any successor provision of state or federal law, the depart-
ment shall immediately terminate future SNAP benefits and initiate disen-
rollment.
(6) The department shall submit to the United States department of
agriculture information concerning any household member for whom it is un-
able to verify eligible citizenship or ineligible alien status pursuant to 7
U.S.C. 2015(f) and this section, regardless of whether such household member
is applying to participate in the program as a member of such household.
(7) When administering SNAP, the department shall:
(a) Consider the entire income and financial resources of any individ-
ual rendered ineligible for participation in SNAP pursuant to 7 U.S.C.
2015(f) and subsection (3) of this section when determining the eligi-
bility and benefit allotment of the household of which such individual
is a member; and
(b) Notwithstanding any options provided pursuant to 7 CFR
273.11(c)(3), not prorate or exclude the income or financial resources
of ineligible aliens pursuant to 7 U.S.C. 2015(f) and subsection (3) of
this section. All such income and resources shall be fully considered.
(3) (8) The state department may promulgate rules, subject to legisla-
tive approval, to implement the provisions of this section.
SECTION 3. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2026.